dev/verb_pardefs.dix
<pardef n="/drosselen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>drosselen</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedrosselt</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drosselen</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drossels</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drosselt</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drosselen</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drosselt</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drosselen</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drossel</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drosselt</l><r>drosselen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/druddelen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>druddelen</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedruddelt</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>druddelen</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>druddels</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>druddelt</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>druddelen</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>druddelt</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>druddelen</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>druddel</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>druddelt</l><r>druddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/drängelen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>drängelen</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedrängelt</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drängelen</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängels</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängelt</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängelen</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängelt</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängelen</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drängel</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängelt</l><r>drängelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/drängen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>drängen</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedrängt</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drängen</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängs</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängt</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängen</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängt</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängen</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dräng</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drängt</l><r>drängen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/dränken__vblex">
  <e><p><l>dränken</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedränkt</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dränken</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dränks</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dränkt</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dränken</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dränkt</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dränken</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dränk</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dränkt</l><r>dränken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/dréchnen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>dréchnen</l><r>dréchnen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/drécken__vblex">
  <e><p><l>drécken</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedréckt</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drécken</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drécks</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréckt</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drécken</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréckt</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drécken</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dréck</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréckt</l><r>drécken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/dréien__vblex">
  <e><p><l>dréien</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedréit</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dréien</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréis</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréit</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréien</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréit</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréien</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dréi</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréit</l><r>dréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/dréngen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>dréngen</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedrongen</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dréngen</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréngs</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréngt</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréngen</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréngt</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréngen</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>dréng</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dréngt</l><r>dréngen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/drénken__vblex">
  <e><p><l>drénken</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedronk</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drénken</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drénks</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drénkt</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drénken</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drénkt</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drénken</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drénk</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drénkt</l><r>drénken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/drëpsen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>drëpsen</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gedrëpst</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drëpsen</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drëps</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drëpst</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drëpsen</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drëpst</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drëpsen</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>drëps</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>drëpst</l><r>drëpsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ducken__vblex">
  <e><p><l>ducken</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>geduckt</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ducken</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ducks</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>duckt</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ducken</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>duckt</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ducken</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>duck</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>duckt</l><r>ducken<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/duerchsetzen__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>duerchsetzen</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>duerchgesat</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>setzen<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>setz<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>setzt<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>setzen<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>setzt<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>setzen<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>setz<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>setzt<b/>duerch</l><r>duerchsetzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
